Colorado, session 2025B, SB25B-001.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend with relocated
provisions 24-75-201.5 as follows:
24-75-201.5. Revenue shortfalls - authority of the governor -
when governor is required to act - definition. (1) [Formerly 24-2-102
(4)] (a) If, during any fiscal period YEAR, THE GOVERNOR DETERMINES
THAT there are not, OR WILL NOT BE, sufficient revenues available for
expenditure during such period THE FISCAL YEAR to carry on the functions
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

of the state government and to support its agencies and institutions, and
such fact is made to appear to the governor THE GOVERNOR MAY, in the
exercise of his THE GOVERNOR'S discretion, by executive order, he may
suspend or discontinue, in whole or in part, the functions or services of any
department, board, bureau, or agency of the state government; except that
the authority of the governor to restrict the expenditure of moneys MONEY
appropriated from the capital construction fund shall MUST be determined
by the provisions of section 24-75-201.5 IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) (I) THE GOVERNOR SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE OF AN EXECUTIVE ORDER ISSUED BY THE GOVERNOR PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (1), INCLUDING AN EXECUTIVE ORDER ISSUED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(c) OF THIS SECTION THAT EXTENDS THE
OPERATION OF A PRIOR EXECUTIVE ORDER. AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER
RECEIVING THE NOTIFICATION, AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION
(1)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE SHALL HOLD A
MEETING TO DISCUSS THE GOVERNOR'S PLANS FOR SUSPENDING OR
DISCONTINUING ANY FUNCTIONS OR SERVICES OF ANY DEPARTMENT, BOARD,
BUREAU, OR AGENCY OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (1). THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE SHALL MAKE ALL
REASONABLE EFFORTS TO HOLD THE MEETING BEFORE THE FIRST DAY OF THE
CALENDAR MONTH FOLLOWING THE ENTRY OF THE EXECUTIVE ORDER. AT
THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE'S MEETING, THE GOVERNOR OR THE OFFICE
OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING, OR BOTH, SHALL PRESENT THE
EXECUTIVE ORDER TO THE COMMITTEE, AND THE COMMITTEE MAY PROVIDE
ADVICE AT THE MEETING REGARDING THE SUSPENSION OR DISCONTINUATION
OF ANY FUNCTIONS OR SERVICES.
(II) THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE IS NOT REQUIRED TO HOLD A
MEETING DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION IF THE
EXECUTIVE ORDER ISSUED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1) IS TO
IMPLEMENT A PLAN DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION AND THE
JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE HELD A MEETING IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION. THIS SUBSECTION (1)(b)(II) DOES NOT
PROHIBIT THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE FROM HOLDING A MEETING AND
REQUESTING THE GOVERNOR OR THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND
BUDGETING, OR BOTH, TO ATTEND THE MEETING.
(c) Such A discontinuance or suspension shall become MADE
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 25B-001

PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1) BECOMES effective upon the first day of
the calendar month following the entry of such THE executive order and
shall MAY continue for such A period of time, not to exceed three months,
as shall be determined by such SET FORTH IN THE executive order. If, during
any such THE period of time, it again appears to the governor DETERMINES
that such THE deficiency of revenues still persists, from time to time, he THE
GOVERNOR may extend the operation of such THE executive order for a like
period of time not to exceed three months; but MONTHS.
(d) The state shall not be IS NOT liable for the payment of any claim
for salaries or expenses SUBJECT TO A SUSPENSION OR DISCONTINUATION
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1) purporting to have accrued against any
such department, board, bureau, or agency during any such period of THE
suspension OR DISCONTINUATION, and the controller shall not issue nor may
AND the state treasurer SHALL NOT honor any warrant therefor. Elective
officers shall not be subject to the provisions of this article, parts 2 and 11
of article 30, and articles 31, 35, 36, and 101 to 111 of this title.
(1) (2) (a) Whenever the revenue estimate for the current fiscal year
prepared BY THE GOVERNOR in accordance with section 24-75-201.3 (2), OR
AN INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE PREPARED BY THE GOVERNOR, indicates that
general fund expenditures for such THAT fiscal year based on appropriations
then in effect will result in the use of USING AN AMOUNT OF THE RESERVE
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 24-75-201.1 (1)(d) THAT IS EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF
THREE PERCENT OF GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE FISCAL YEAR
OR one-half or more of the reserve required by section 24-75-201.1 (1)(d),
the governor shall formulate a plan for reducing such general fund
expenditures so that said THE reserve, as of the close of the fiscal year, will
be at least BELOW THE AMOUNT REQUIRED IN SECTION 24-75-201.1 (1)(d) BY
NO MORE THAN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THREE PERCENT OF GENERAL FUND
APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE FISCAL YEAR OR one-half OR MORE of the amount
required by said section 24-75-201.1 (1)(d), AS APPLICABLE. IF THE
GOVERNOR IS IMPLEMENTING A PLAN PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(d) OF
THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNOR IS NOT REQUIRED TO FORMULATE AND
IMPLEMENT A PLAN PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a).
(b) The governor shall promptly notify the general assembly of the
A plan CREATED BY THE GOVERNOR PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2). THE
JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE SHALL HOLD A MEETING AS SOON AS
PRACTICABLE AFTER THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IS NOTIFIED OF THE PLAN. AT
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 25B-001

THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE'S MEETING, THE GOVERNOR OR THE OFFICE
OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING, OR BOTH, SHALL PRESENT THE PLAN
TO THE COMMITTEE, AND THE COMMITTEE MAY PROVIDE ADVICE AT THE
MEETING REGARDING THE PLAN.
(c) The GOVERNOR SHALL PROMPTLY IMPLEMENT A plan shall be
promptly implemented by the governor, CREATED BY THE GOVERNOR
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) using the procedures set forth in section
24-2-102 (4) SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION or SECTION 24-50-109.5 or
any other lawful means.
(b) to (g) Repealed.
(h) (d) Whenever the revenue estimate for the current fiscal year,
prepared BY THE GOVERNOR in accordance with section 24-75-201.3 (2), OR
AN INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE PREPARED BY THE GOVERNOR, indicates that
general fund expenditures for that fiscal year based on appropriations then
in effect will result in the use of an amount of the reserve required by
section 24-75-201.1 (1)(d) that would result in that reserve equaling less
than one billion dollars, the governor shall formulate a plan for reducing
such general fund expenditures so that said THE reserve, as of the close of
the fiscal year, will be at least one billion dollars. The governor shall
promptly notify the general assembly of the plan and promptly implement
the plan in accordance with section 24-2-102 (4) or 24-50-109.5 or any
other lawful means. THE PROCEDURES AND REQUIREMENTS IN SUBSECTIONS
(2)(b) AND (2)(c) OF THIS SECTION APPLY TO A PLAN FORMULATED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(d). IF THE GOVERNOR IS IMPLEMENTING
A PLAN PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNOR
IS NOT REQUIRED TO FORMULATE AND IMPLEMENT A PLAN PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(d).
(e) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2), "INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE
PREPARED BY THE GOVERNOR" MEANS AN UPDATED REVENUE ESTIMATE IN
THE TIME BETWEEN TWO ESTIMATES MADE BY THE GOVERNOR PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-75-201.3 (2), WHICH INTERIM ESTIMATE IS PREPARED BY THE
GOVERNOR, DESIGNATED BY THE GOVERNOR AS AN INTERIM REVENUE
ESTIMATE THAT IS AN UPDATE TO THE MOST RECENT PRIOR REVENUE
ESTIMATE, TRANSMITTED TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, AND PRESENTED AT
A MEETING OF THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE AS AN INTERIM REVENUE
ESTIMATE THAT IS AN UPDATE TO THE MOST RECENT PRIOR REVENUE
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 25B-001

ESTIMATE.
(2) (3) In formulating a plan for the reduction of general fund
expenditures as required by subsection (1) SUBSECTION (2) of this section,
the governor may consider any recommendations for reducing general fund
expenditures of the institutions of higher education submitted by the
Colorado commission on higher education, after consultation with the
governing boards of such THE institutions.
(3) Repealed.
(4) Whenever the governor has formulated and implemented a plan
to reduce general fund expenditures in accordance with subsection (1)
SUBSECTION (2) of this section, and such THE plan reduces general fund
expenditures in an amount equal to or greater than one percent of all general
fund appropriations for the fiscal year, the governor, after consultation with
the capital development committee and the joint budget committee, may
transfer general fund moneys MONEY from the capital construction fund into
the general fund. Pursuant to this subsection (4), the governor will MAY
ONLY restrict the capital construction projects in the reverse order of the
priorities as established by the capital development committee unless
approved by the capital development committee and the joint budget
committee.
(5) NOTWITHSTANDING THE AUTHORITY IN THIS SECTION TO
FORMULATE AND IMPLEMENT A PLAN TO REDUCE GENERAL FUND
EXPENDITURES, THE GOVERNOR SHALL NOT REDUCE GENERAL FUND
EXPENDITURES BY THE JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT, THE LEGISLATIVE
DEPARTMENT, OR ELECTIVE OFFICERS OTHER THAN THE GOVERNOR
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-2-102, repeal (4);
and add (5) as follows:
24-2-102. Appointment of officers and employees. (4) If, during
any fiscal period, there are not sufficient revenues available for expenditure
during such period to carry on the functions of the state government and to
support its agencies and institutions and such fact is made to appear to the
governor, in the exercise of his discretion, by executive order, he may
suspend or discontinue, in whole or in part, the functions or services of any
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 25B-001

department, board, bureau, or agency of the state government; except that
the authority of the governor to restrict the expenditure of moneys
appropriated from the capital construction fund shall be determined by the
provisions of section 24-75-201.5. Such discontinuance or suspension shall
become effective upon the first day of the calendar month following the
entry of such executive order and shall continue for such period of time, not
to exceed three months, as shall be determined by such executive order. If,
during any such period of time, it again appears to the governor that such
deficiency of revenues still persists, from time to time, he may extend the
operation of such executive order for a like period of time not to exceed
three months; but the state shall not be liable for the payment of any claim
for salaries or expenses purporting to have accrued against any such
department, board, bureau, or agency during any such period of suspension,
and the controller shall not issue nor may the state treasurer honor any
warrant therefor. Elective officers shall not be subject to the provisions of
this article, parts 2 and 11 of article 30, and articles 31, 35, 36, and 101 to
111 of this title.
(5) ELECTIVE OFFICERS SHALL NOT BE SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS
OF THIS ARTICLE 2, PARTS 2 AND 11 OF ARTICLE 30, AND ARTICLES 31, 35, 36,
AND 101 TO 111 OF THIS TITLE 24.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-30-1404, amend
(7)(e) as follows:
24-30-1404. Contracts - definition. (7) (e) In the event that the
governor restricts or delays the expenditure of money for a project for
which a professional services contract is required pursuant to the authority
granted to the governor in section 24-75-201.5 SECTION 24-75-201.5 (2), the
deadlines imposed in subsection (7)(a) of this section for such THE projects
shall be ARE tolled until such time as the restriction or delay is no longer in
effect, at which time the professional services contract must be executed
and encumbered and any contract with the contractor must be entered into
within six months.
SECTION 4. Applicability. This act applies to revenue estimates
and interim revenue estimates presented, and executive orders issued, on or
after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 25B-001

determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Connor Randall
SECRETARY OF ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 25B-001